Nevada, session 83, AB158.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 14 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A court of this State may exercise general personal
jurisdiction over a corporation, miscellaneous organization
described in chapter 81 of NRS, limited-liability company, limited-
liability partnership, limited partnership, limited-liability limited
partnership, business trust or municipal corporation created and
existing under the laws of this State, any other state, territory or
foreign government or the Government of the United States on the
-
*AB158*

– 2 –
sole basis that the corporation, organization, company,
partnership or trust:
(a) Is organized, registered or qualified to do business
pursuant to the laws of this State;
(b) Expressly consents to the jurisdiction; or
(c) Has sufficient contact with the State such that the exercise
of general personal jurisdiction does not offend traditional notions
of fair play and substantial justice.
2. If a court of this State exercises jurisdiction over a
corporation, organization, company, partnership or trust on the
basis of subsection 1:
(a) Any cause of action may be asserted or maintained against
the corporation, organization, company, partnership or trust,
regardless of whether the cause of action arises from or is incident
to an act described in subsection 1; and
(b) Discontinuance of an act described in subsection 1 does
not affect jurisdiction with respect to any act, transaction or
omission that occurs during the period in which the act was
discontinued.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of section 1 of this act
apply to an action commenced on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB158*